Maryland, session 2026, HB1273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1273*

HOUSE BILL 1273
9–105.
(a) (9) “Taxable assessment” means the assessment on which the property tax
rate was imposed in the preceding taxable year, adjusted by the phased–in assessment
increase resulting from a revaluation under § 8–104(c)(1)(iii) of this article, less the amount
of any assessment on which a property tax credit under this section is authorized.
(e) (1) For each taxable year, the property tax credit under this section is
calculated by:
(i) multiplying the prior year’s taxable assessment by the
homestead credit percentage as provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection;
(ii) subtracting that amount from the current year’s assessment; and
(iii) if the difference is a positive number, multiplying the difference
by the applicable property tax rate for the current year.
(2) For each taxable year, the homestead credit percentage under
paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection is:
(i) for the State property tax and for any property tax imposed for a
bicounty commission, [110%] 105%;
(ii) for the county property tax:
1. the homestead credit percentage established by the county
under paragraph (3) of this subsection; or
2. if the county has not set a percentage for the taxable year
under paragraph (3) of this subsection or has not notified the Department as required under
paragraph (6) of this subsection, the homestead credit percentage in effect for the county
for the preceding taxable year; and
(iii) for the municipal corporation property tax:
1. the homestead credit percentage established by the
municipal corporation under paragraph (4) of this subsection; or
2. if the municipal corporation has not set a percentage
under paragraph (4) of this subsection or has not notified the Department as required under
paragraph (7) of this subsection, the homestead credit percentage for the taxable year for
the county in which the property is located.
(3) Subject to paragraph (5) of this subsection, the Mayor and City Council
of Baltimore City and the governing body of a county on or before March 15 of any year

HOUSE BILL 1273 3
shall set, by law, the homestead credit percentage for the taxable year beginning the
following July 1.
(4) Subject to paragraph (5) of this subsection, on or before March 25 of any
year, the governing body of a municipal corporation may set or alter, by law, a homestead
credit percentage for the taxable year beginning the following July 1 and any subsequent
taxable year.
(5) The homestead credit percentage for any county or municipal
corporation property tax:
(i) may not be less than 100% or exceed [110%] 105% for any
taxable year; and
(ii) shall be expressed in increments of 1 percentage point.
(6) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City and the governing body
of a county shall notify the Department of any action taken under paragraph (3) of this
subsection on or before March 15 preceding the taxable year for which the action is taken.
(7) A municipal corporation shall notify the Department of any action
taken under paragraph (4) of this subsection on or before March 25 preceding the taxable
year for which the action is taken.
9–105.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DWELLING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–105 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(3) “HOMEOWNER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–105 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(4) “NEW DWELLING” MEANS THE DWELLING WHERE A HOMEOWNER
RESIDES AT THE TIME THE HOMEOWNER SEEKS THE ADJUSTMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(5) “PREVIOUS DWELLING” MEANS A DWELLING FOR WHICH A
HOMEOWNER RECEIVED THE CREDIT UNDER § 9–105 OF THIS SUBTITLE WITHIN THE
3 YEARS PRECEDING THE HOMEOWNER’S ACQUISITION OF A NEW DWELLING.
(6) “TAXABLE ASSESSMENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–105
OF THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1273
(B) THERE IS A HOMESTEAD CREDIT PORTABILITY ADJUSTMENT AS
PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.
(C) A HOMEOWNER IS ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE THE HOMESTEAD CREDIT
PORTABILITY ADJUSTMENT IF THE HOMEOWNER:
(1) RESIDES IN A NEW DWELLING;
(2) RESIDED IN A PREVIOUS DWELLING; AND
(3) MEETS THE APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED IN THIS
SECTION.
(D) THE HOMESTEAD CREDIT PORTABILITY ADJUSTMENT IS CALCULATED
AS FOLLOWS:
(1) THE TAXABLE ASSESSMENT OF THE HOMEOWNER’S PREVIOUS
DWELLING IN THE TAXABLE YEAR THE HOMEOWNER RELINQUISHED OWNERSHIP OF
THE PREVIOUS DWELLING IS SUBTRACTED FROM THE ASSESSMENT OF THE
HOMEOWNER’S PREVIOUS DWELLING IN THE TAXABLE YEAR THE HOMEOWNER
RELINQUISHED OWNERSHIP OF THE PREVIOUS DWELLING; AND
(2) THE DIFFERENCE CALCULATED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS SUBTRACTED FROM THE ASSESSMENT OF THE HOMEOWNER’S NEW
DWELLING.
(E) THE HOMESTEAD CREDIT PORTABILITY ADJUSTMENT:
(1) APPLIES IN EACH TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE HOMEOWNER
RECEIVES THE CREDIT UNDER § 9–105 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR THE HOMEOWNER’S
NEW DWELLING; AND
(2) MAY NOT EXCEED $500,000 OF THE ASSESSMENT OF THE NEW
DWELLING.
(F) (1) A HOMEOWNER SHALL APPLY FOR THE HOMESTEAD CREDIT
PORTABILITY ADJUSTMENT ON THE HOMESTEAD CREDIT APPLICATION FORM
UNDER § 9–105(D)(6) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MODIFY THE HOMESTEAD CREDIT
APPLICATION FORM UNDER § 9–105(D)(6) OF THIS SUBTITLE AS NECESSARY TO

HOUSE BILL 1273 5
DETERMINE AN APPLICANT’S ELIGIBILITY FOR THE HOMESTEAD CREDIT
PORTABILITY ADJUSTMENT.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.